Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 144G.45, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Exceptions. new text begin (a) new text end To accommodate the needs of an aging population in Otter Tail County, a three-story building with Type IIIB construction located in Otter Tail County may apply for an assisted living license under section 144G.191. This deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin paragraphnew text end expires December 31, 2025. new text begin (b) To accommodate the needs of an aging population in Hennepin County, a four-story building with Type V construction located in Saint Anthony, Minnesota, may apply for an assisted living license under section 144G.191. This paragraph expires December 31, 2026. new text end